California statutes. Education Code
 or state special school shall provide all of the following information in responding to a request for the transfer of accumulated leave of absence for illness or injury from the subsequent employing entity:

(1) The name and identification number for the employee requesting the transfer.

(2) The contact information for that former employing entity.

(3) The time period of the service, including start date and end date, for the employee requesting the transfer.

(4) The number of days of leave of absence, including any fraction thereof, for illness or injury to be transferred based on the former employing entity’s workday.

(5) The contact information for the subsequent employing entity.

(6) The signature of the person completing and verifying the accuracy of the information provided pursuant to this subdivision, including that person’s name, title, and contact information.

(c) A school district, community college district, county office of education, or state special school shall not adopt a policy or rule, written or unwritten, that requires a certificated employee transferring to that school district, community college district, county office of education, or
 state special school to waive any part or all of the leave of absence that the certificated employee may be entitled to have transferred pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.   (AB 2134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44980.

A certificated employee of any school district or state special school who accepts a position requiring certification qualifications in the office of any county superintendent of schools; or, any certificated employee of any county superintendent of schools who accepts a position requiring certification qualifications in a school district, state special school, or office of another county superintendent of schools; or, any person employed by the department in a
 position requiring certification qualifications or an employee of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges who accepts a position requiring certification qualifications in any school district, state special school, or office of any county superintendent of schools; or, any certificated employee of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing who accepts a position requiring certification qualifications in any school district, state special school, or office of any county superintendent of schools; shall have transferred with the employee to the second position the employee’s accumulated total number of days of leave of absence for illness or injury. The amount of leave to be transferred shall be
 determined in the same manner as provided in Section 44979. All other provisions of Section 44979 shall also apply to the employees and employers described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 381, Sec. 2.   (AB 2134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44981.

Any days of leave of absence for illness or injury allowed pursuant to Section 44978 may be used by the employee, at his or her election in cases of personal necessity. The governing board of each school district and each office of county superintendent of schools shall adopt rules and regulations requiring and prescribing the manner of proof of personal necessity for purposes of this section.

The employee shall not be required to secure advance permission for leave taken for any of the following reasons: 

(1) Death or serious illness of a member of his or her immediate family. 

(2) Accident, involving his or her person or property, or the person or property of a member of his or her immediate family. 

No such accumulated leave in excess of seven (7) days may be used in any school year for the purposes enumerated in this section unless a maximum number of days in excess of seven (7) is specified for that purpose in an agreement between the exclusive bargaining representative and the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44982.

A person employed by a school district, county superintendent of schools, or state special school in a position requiring certification qualifications who accepts a professional education position in the department, the appointment that is, or is intended to become, permanent, shall have transferred with the employee to the department the employee’s accumulated total number of days of leave of absence for illness or injury. The amount of that leave to be transferred shall be determined in the same manner as provided in Section 44979, except the transferred accumulated sick leave shall not exceed that amount of accumulated
 sick leave that the person would have earned as an employee in the system to which the employee is transferring. All other provisions of Section 44979 shall also apply to the employees and employers described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 381, Sec. 3.   (AB 2134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44983.

Section 44977 shall not apply to any school district which adopts and maintains in effect a rule which provides that when a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications is absent from his duties on account of illness or accident for a period of five school months or less whether or not the absence arises out of or in the course of the employment of the employee, he shall receive 50 percent or more of his regular salary during the period of such absence and nothing in Section 44977 shall be construed as preventing the governing board of any district from adopting any such rule.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, when a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications is absent from his duties on account of illness for a period of more than five school months, or when a person is absent from his duties for a cause other than illness, the amount deducted from the salary due him for the month in which the absence occurs shall be determined according to the rules and regulations established by the governing board of the district. Such rules and regulations shall not conflict with rules and regulations of the State Board of Education.

Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to deprive any district, city, or city and county of the right to make any reasonable rule for the regulation of accident or sick leave or cumulative accident or sick leave without loss of salary for persons requiring certification qualifications.

This section shall be applicable whether or not the absence from duty is by reason of a leave of absence granted by the governing board of the employing district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44984.

(a) The governing board of a school district shall provide by rules and regulations for industrial accident and illness leaves of absence for all certificated employees. The governing board of a school district that is created or whose boundaries or status is changed by an action to organize or reorganize school districts completed after the effective date of this section shall provide by rules and regulations for these leaves of absence on or before the date on which the organization or reorganization of the school district becomes effective for all purposes.

(b) The rules or regulations shall include the following provisions:

(1) Allowable leave shall be for not less than 60 days during which the
 schools of the school district are required to be in session or when the employee would otherwise have been performing work for the school district in any one fiscal year for the same accident.

(2) Allowable leave shall not be accumulated from year to year.

(3) Industrial accident or illness leave shall commence on the first day of absence.

(4) (A) If a certificated employee is absent from his or her duties on account of an industrial accident or illness, he or she shall be paid the portion of the salary due him or her for any month in which the absence occurs as, when added to his or her temporary disability indemnity under Division 4 or Division 4.5 of the Labor Code, will result in a payment to him or her of not more than his or her full salary.

(B) The phrase “full salary” as used in this subdivision shall be computed so that it shall not be less than the employee’s “average weekly earnings” as that phrase is used in Section 4453 of the Labor Code. For purposes of this section, however, the maximum and minimum average weekly earnings set forth in Section 4453 of the Labor Code shall otherwise not be deemed applicable.

(5) Industrial accident or illness leave shall be reduced by one day for each day of authorized absence regardless of a temporary disability indemnity award.

(6) When an industrial accident or illness leave overlaps into the next fiscal year, the employee shall be entitled to only the amount of unused leave due him or her for the same illness or injury.

(c) Upon termination of the
 industrial accident or illness leave, the employee shall be entitled to the benefits provided in Sections 44977, 44978, and 44983, and for purposes of each of these sections, the employee’s absence shall be deemed to have commenced on the date of termination of the industrial accident or illness leave, provided that if the employee continues to receive temporary disability indemnity, the employee may elect to take as much of his or her accumulated sick leave as, when added to his or her temporary disability indemnity, will result in a payment to him or her of not more than his or her full salary.

(d) The governing board of a school district may, by rule or regulation, provide for an additional leave of absence for industrial accident or illness as it deems appropriate.

(e) During a paid leave of absence, the employee may endorse to the school district the temporary disability
 indemnity checks received on account of the employee’s industrial accident or illness. The school district, in turn, shall issue the employee appropriate salary warrants for payment of the employee’s salary and shall deduct normal retirement, other authorized contributions, and the temporary disability indemnity, if any, actually paid to and retained by the employee for periods covered by the salary warrants.

(f) In the absence of rules and regulations adopted by the governing board of a school district pursuant to this section, an employee shall be entitled to industrial accident or illness leave as provided in this section but without limitation as to the number of days of that leave.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 62.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

44985.

Every person employed by a school district in a position requiring certification qualifications is entitled to a leave of absence, not to exceed three days, or five days if out-of-state travel is required, on account of the death of any member of his immediate family. No deduction shall be made from the salary of such employee nor shall such leave be deducted from leave granted by other sections of this code or provided by the governing board of the district. The governing board may enlarge the benefits of this section and may expand the class of relatives listed below as members of the immediate family. Members of the immediate family, as used in this section, means the mother, father, grandmother, grandfather, or a grandchild of the employee or of the spouse of the employee, and the spouse, son, son-in-law, daughter, daughter-in-law, brother, or sister of the employee, or any relative living in the immediate household of the employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44986.

(a) The governing board of a school district may grant a leave of absence to any certificated employee who has applied for disability benefits, not to exceed 30 days beyond final determination of the employee’s eligibility for disability benefits by the State Teachers’ Retirement System. If the employee is determined to be eligible for the disability benefits by the system, that leave shall be extended for the term of disability, but not more than 39 months.

(b) (1) Governing boards of school districts shall classify as temporary employees those persons employed to fill vacancies caused by the absence of certificated employees who are classified as permanent and are receiving a disability or insurance allowance or benefit from the system or from a group insurance plan for which the employer is paying the cost or deducting the cost from the employees’ salaries.

(2) For purposes of this section, the term of employment of the temporary employee shall be equal to the number of days of absence of the employee receiving the disability benefit.

(3) If the term of employment extends beyond this period, the employee shall be credited for all days served as a probationary employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1144, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44986.1.

Any member for whom the employer makes application for a disability benefit and whom the State Teachers’ Retirement System finds not to be disabled under this chapter, shall be reinstated to the former position upon receipt by the employer of notification from the system of the denial of the disability benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1144, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44987.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district shall grant to any employee, upon request, a leave of absence without loss of compensation for the purpose of enabling the employee to serve as an elected officer of any local school district public employee organization, or any statewide or national public employee organization with which the local organization is affiliated.

(2) The leave shall include, but is not limited to, absence for purposes of attendance by the employee at periodic, stated, special, or regular meetings of the body of the organization on which the employee serves as an officer. Compensation during the leave shall include retirement fund
 contributions required of the school district as employer. The required employer contribution rate shall be the rate adopted by the Teachers’ Retirement Board as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program as provided in Section 22711. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions as prescribed by Section 22711. Any employee who serves as a full-time officer of a public employee organization is not eligible for disability benefits under the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan while on the leave of absence.

(3) Following the school district’s payment of the employee for the leave of absence, the school district shall be reimbursed by the employee organization of which the employee is an elected officer for all compensation paid the employee on account of the leave. Reimbursement
 by the employee organization shall be made within 10 days after its receipt of the school district’s certification of payment of compensation to the employee.

(4) The leave of absence without loss of compensation provided for by this section is in addition to the released time without loss of compensation granted to representatives of an exclusive representative by subdivision (c) of Section 3543.1 of the Government Code. The leave provided under this section shall be in addition to any leave to which public employees may be entitled by other laws or by a memorandum of understanding or collective bargaining agreement.

(5) For purposes of this section, “school district” also means “county superintendent
 of schools.”

(b) (1) An employee who after August 31, 1978, was absent on account of elected-officer service, shall receive full service credit in the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The employee makes a written request to the employer for a leave of absence for the period of the elected-officer service.

(B) The employee organization of which the member is an elected officer pays to the member’s employer an
 amount equal to the required State Teachers’ Retirement Plan member and employer retirement contributions, including regular interest on the balance of contributions due to the State Teachers’ Retirement System, calculated from the date the contributions would have been due when the elected-officer service was performed to the date payment is received by the State Teachers’ Retirement System, compounded daily based on the regular interest rate in effect the day the payment is received by the State Teachers’ Retirement System, as prescribed by this section.

(2) The school district, following this written request and payment, shall transmit the amount received to the State Teachers’ Retirement System, informing it of the period of the employee’s leave of absence. The State Teachers’ Retirement
 System shall credit the employee with all service credit earned for the period of the elected-officer leave of absence.

(3) If the employee has been compensated by the school district for the period of the service, then, as a condition to the employee’s entitlement to service credit for this period, the school district shall be reimbursed by the employee organization for the amount of the compensation.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, this section shall apply retroactively to all service as an elected officer in a public employee organization occurring after August 31, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 539, Sec. 2.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44987.3.

(a) The governing board of a school district shall grant to any employee, upon request, a leave of absence without loss of any compensation for the purpose of enabling the employee to serve on any of the following boards, commissions, committees, or groups, so long as the requirements of subdivision (b) are satisfied:

(1) Advisory Commission on Special Education, as provided for by Section 33590.

(2) Advisory committee for child care and development services, as provided in Section 8286.

(3) Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission, as provided for by Section 33530.

(4) Educational Innovation and Planning Commission, as provided for by Section 33502.

(5) Educational Management and Evaluation Commission, as provided for by Section 33550.

(6) Any other group, commission, or board authorized by statute; or commission or board, any of whose members are appointed by the Governor or the state board; whose purposes and activities are to further public education, exclusive of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(b) A leave of absence shall not be granted unless all the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) Service is performed in the State of California.

(2) The board, commission,
 committee, or group, in writing, informs the employee’s district of the service.

(3) The board, commission, committee, or group agrees, prior to service, to reimburse the school district pursuant to subdivision (d).

(c) The leave of absence shall be limited to 20 schooldays per school year.

(d) Following the school district’s payment of the employee for the leave of absence, the school district shall be reimbursed by the board, commission, committee, or group that the employee serves for the compensation paid to the employee’s substitute and for actual administrative costs related to the leave of absence granted to the employee under this section, upon written request for reimbursement by the school district. Reimbursement by the board, commission, committee, or group shall be made within 10 days after its receipt of
 the school district’s certification of payment of compensation to the employee and of payment of compensation to the employee’s substitute.

(e) The leave of absence without loss of compensation provided for by this section is in addition to the release time without loss of compensation granted to representatives of an exclusive representative by subdivision (c) of Section 3543.1 of the Government Code and the leave of absence granted employees by Section 44987.

(f) As used in this section, “school district” also means a county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 15.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44988.

Prior to July 1 of any school year, the governing board of any school district may designate other days during such year as the holidays to which certificated employees are entitled in lieu of the holidays on February 12 known as “Lincoln Day,” the third Monday in February known as “Washington Day,” the last Monday in May known as “Memorial Day,” or November 11 known as “Veterans Day,” provided that such designated days will provide for at least a three-day weekend. Certificated employees shall be required to work on the regular holiday for which another day is designated pursuant to this section, and for work of eight hours or less, shall be paid compensation at their regular rate of pay.

If any certificated employee would be entitled to the regular paid holiday but would not be in a paid status during any portion of the working day immediately preceding or succeeding the day so designated in lieu of such holiday and therefore would not be entitled to such day in lieu of the holiday, he or she shall be entitled to the regular holiday.

This section shall not be construed to authorize the maintenance of schools on holidays other than as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 37220) of Chapter 2 of Part 22.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 47.5.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.3. Testimony of Minor Witnesses at Dismissal or Suspension Hearings [44990. - 44994.]

44990.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to provide an administrative law judge with discretion to employ alternative hearing procedures to protect the rights of a minor witness, the rights of the respondent, and the integrity of the judicial process. In exercising its discretion, the administrative law judge necessarily shall be required to balance the rights of the respondent against the need to protect a minor witness and to preserve the integrity of the truth-finding function. This discretion is intended to be used selectively when the facts and circumstances in an individual case present compelling evidence of the need to use these alternative procedures.

(b) As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Judge” means the administrative law judge presiding over the dismissal or suspension hearing.

(2) “Minor” means any person under 18 years of age.

(3) “Representative of the respondent” means either counsel for, or an exclusive labor representative of, the respondent.

(4) “Respondent” means the party against whom a petition has been filed.

(5) “Support person” means an adult attendant, victim advocate, or other witness who is able, because of education, experience, or familiarity with the minor, to ensure that the minor’s mental
 health, welfare, and well-being are protected.

(c) In accordance with Section 44994, this article shall apply only to proceedings brought pursuant to Section 44934.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 996, Sec. 1.   (AB 2234)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44991.

(a) (1) In an administrative proceeding held pursuant to Section 44934.1 involving an alleged offense involving a minor that meets the definition of egregious misconduct under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, counsel for a school district may apply for an order that the minor’s testimony be taken in a room outside the hearing room and be televised by two-way closed-circuit television and bears the burden of proving that such an order is justified. The person seeking such an order shall apply for the order at least seven days before the hearing date, unless the judge finds on the record that the need for such an order was not reasonably foreseeable.

(2) The judge may order that the testimony of the minor be taken by
 closed-circuit television as provided in paragraph (1) if the judge finds that the minor is unable to testify in the hearing room in the presence of the respondent for any of the following reasons:

(A) The minor is unable to testify because of emotional distress, established by a written statement of the minor, the minor’s parent or guardian, the minor’s support person, or a mental health professional who has evaluated the minor.

(B) There is a substantial likelihood, established by expert testimony, that the minor would suffer emotional distress from testifying.

(C) According to expert testimony, the minor suffers from a medical condition, mental condition, or other infirmity.

(D) The judge finds that conduct of the respondent or the respondent’s
 representative causes the minor to be unable to continue testifying.

(3) The judge shall rule on the application, and support a ruling on the minor’s inability to testify with findings on the record. In determining whether the impact on an individual minor of one or more of the factors described in paragraph (2) is so substantial as to justify an order under paragraph (1), the judge may question the minor in the judge’s office, or at some comfortable place other than the hearing room, on the record for a reasonable period of time in the presence of the minor’s parent or guardian, the minor’s support person, counsel for the school district, and a representative of the respondent.

(4) If the judge orders the taking of testimony by television, counsel for the school district and a representative of the respondent, not including a respondent represented pro se, shall be present in a
 room outside the hearing room with the minor, and the minor shall be subjected to direct and cross-examination. The following are the only other persons who may be permitted in the room with the minor during the minor’s testimony:

(A) Any persons necessary to operate the closed-circuit television equipment.

(B) The parent or guardian of the minor.

(C) Any other persons whose presence is determined by the judge to be necessary to the welfare and well-being of the minor, including, but not necessarily limited to, a judicial officer or support person.

(5) In making the determination required by this subdivision, the judge shall consider the age, maturity, and cognitive ability of the minor, compared with other minors of the same age, the relationship
 between the minor and the respondent, any handicap or disability of the minor, and the nature of the acts alleged to have been committed by the respondent. The minor’s testimony shall be under oath and transmitted by closed-circuit television into the hearing room for viewing and hearing by the respondent, the judge, and any members of the public in attendance. The respondent shall be provided with the means of private, contemporaneous communication with the respondent’s representative during the testimony. The closed-circuit television transmission shall relay into the room in which the minor is testifying the respondent’s image, and the voice of the judge.

(b) (1) In an administrative proceeding held pursuant to Section 44934.1 involving an alleged offense involving a minor that meets the definition of egregious misconduct under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, counsel for the school district may apply
 for an order that a deposition be taken of the minor’s testimony and that the deposition be recorded and preserved on videotape based upon the same criteria that would allow a minor’s testimony to be taken in a room outside the hearing room and be televised by two-way closed-circuit television, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of this section. Counsel for the school district shall bear the burden of proving that an order applied for under this paragraph is justified in order to be consistent with subdivision (a) of this section.

(2) Upon timely receipt of an application described in paragraph (1), the judge shall make a preliminary finding regarding whether the minor is likely to be unable to testify in the hearing room in the physical presence of the respondent, the judge, and the public for any of the reasons set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(3) If
 the judge finds that the minor is likely to be unable to testify in open hearing for any of the reasons set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the judge shall order that the minor’s deposition be taken and preserved by videotape.

(4) The judge shall preside at the videotaped deposition of a minor, and shall rule on all questions as if at the hearing. The following are the only other persons who shall be permitted to be present at the videotaped deposition:

(A) Counsel for the school district.

(B) Representative of the respondent.

(C) Any persons necessary to operate the videotape equipment.

(D) The respondent, unless the judge excludes the respondent from the hearing room pursuant
 to paragraph (6).

(E) The parent or guardian of the minor.

(F) Any support person appointed pursuant to Section 44993 to protect the mental health, welfare, and well-being of the minor.

(5) The respondent shall be afforded the rights applicable to respondents during trials, including the right to be confronted with the witness against the respondent and the right to cross-examine the minor.

(6) If the preliminary finding of inability under paragraph (2) is based on evidence that the minor is unable to testify in the physical presence of the respondent, the judge may order that the respondent, including a respondent represented pro se, be excluded from the room in which the deposition is conducted. If the judge orders that the respondent be excluded from
 the deposition room, the judge shall order that two-way closed-circuit television equipment relay the respondent’s image into the room in which the minor is testifying, and the minor’s testimony into the room in which the respondent is viewing the proceeding, and that the respondent be provided with a means of private, contemporaneous communication with the respondent’s representative during the deposition.

(7) The complete record of the deposition of the minor, including the image and voices of all persons who in any way participate in the deposition, shall be made and preserved on videotape in addition to being stenographically recorded. The videotape shall be transmitted to the judge’s office, and shall be made available for viewing by counsel for the school district, representative of the respondent, and the respondent during ordinary business hours.

(8) If at the time of the
 hearing, the judge finds that the minor is unavailable or unable to testify in open hearing for a reason described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the judge may admit into evidence the minor’s videotaped deposition in lieu of the minor’s testifying at the hearing. The judge shall support any ruling made pursuant to this paragraph with findings on the record.

(9) Upon timely receipt of notice that new evidence has been discovered after the original videotaping and before or during the hearing, the judge, for good cause shown, may order an additional videotaped deposition. The testimony of the minor shall be restricted to the matters specified by the judge as the basis for granting the order.

(10) In connection with the taking of a videotaped deposition under this subdivision, the judge may enter a protective order for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the
 minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 56.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

44992.

(a) With a witness under 18 years of age, or a dependent person with a substantial cognitive impairment, the judge shall take special care to protect the witness from undue harassment or embarrassment, and to restrict the unnecessary repetition of questions. The judge shall also take special care to ensure that questions are stated in a form that is appropriate to the age, maturity, or cognitive level of the witness. The judge may, in the interests of justice, on objection by a party, forbid the asking of a question that is in a form that is not reasonably likely to be understood by a person of the age, maturity, or cognitive level of the witness.

(b) When a
 minor testifies, the judge may order the exclusion from the hearing room of all persons, including members of the press, who do not have a direct interest in the case. This order may be made if the judge determines, on the record, that requiring the minor to testify in the open hearing room would cause substantial psychological harm to the minor or would result in the minor’s inability to effectively communicate. Such an order shall be narrowly tailored to serve the specific compelling interest of the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 996, Sec. 1.   (AB 2234)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44993.

(a) (1) A support person selected by the minor witness shall be appointed for the minor witness at the onset of the hearing, unless that person does not have the education, experience, and familiarity with the minor witness to protect the minor’s mental health, welfare, and well-being. A parent or guardian of the minor witness shall be presumed to be qualified to serve as the support person for the minor.

(2) If the minor witness does not make a selection, or does not select a person who is able, because of education, experience, or familiarity with the minor, to ensure that the minor’s mental health, welfare, and well-being are protected, or
 the judge determines that the minor’s parent or guardian is not qualified to serve as the support person for the minor witness, the judge shall select and appoint a support person for the minor. The support person shall be present during all stages of the hearing to provide support to the minor.

(b) If the respondent wants to contact the minor witness, the respondent shall contact the support person to coordinate any legal contact, including, but not necessarily limited to, an interview, deposition, or other hearing preparation task.

(c) The respondent may not use a private investigator or similar professional to make contact with the minor.

(d) The judge, at his or her discretion, may allow the support person to remain
 in close physical proximity to or in contact with the minor while the minor testifies. A support person shall not provide the minor with an answer to any question directed to the minor during the course of the minor’s testimony or otherwise prompt the minor.

(e) A support person appointed by the judge shall assist the
 minor to express the minor’s views concerning the personal consequences of the minor’s victimization, at a level and in a form of communication commensurate with the minor’s age, maturity, and cognitive ability.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a support person may, but need not, be assigned to a minor witness if that minor witness was not a direct victim of the alleged egregious misconduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 996, Sec. 1.   (AB 2234)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44994.

This article shall apply to a hearing conducted by an administrative law judge in any dismissal or suspension hearing held pursuant to Section 44934.1 involving an alleged offense involving a minor that meets the definition of egregious misconduct pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 996, Sec. 1.   (AB 2234)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Increased Cost of Dismissal Procedure [45020. - 45020.]

45020.

The amount determined pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 42233 shall be adjusted to allow for any increased costs to a school district which may be incurred by it in carrying out the requirements imposed by the amendments made to Section 44949 by the act enacting this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Salaries [45022. - 45061.5.]

45022.

The governing board of any school district shall fix and order paid the compensation of persons in public school service requiring certification qualifications employed by the board unless otherwise prescribed by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45023.

The governing board of each school district shall adopt and cause to be printed and made available to each certificated employee a schedule of salaries to be paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45023.5.

If compensation is provided to certificated employees of any elementary, high, or unified school district for a work assignment which is not part of the contracted instructional day duties, like compensation, whether paid on an hourly or monthly basis, or on a flat rate basis or otherwise, shall be paid to all certificated employees of the district who perform like work with comparable responsibilities. Under no condition shall certificated employees who are working comparable hours and responsibilities beyond the instructional day be paid differently based on the employee’s sex. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a school district from establishing a salary schedule based on experience for persons who are employed for such work. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a district to compensate certificated employees for work assignments which are not part of the contracted instructional day duties simply because other employees of the district receive compensation for work assignments which involve different types of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

45024.

Every person employed by the district in a position requiring certification qualifications in a day school of the district for not less than the minimum schoolday for each day the schools of the district are maintained during the school year is a full-time employee and his compensation shall be fixed accordingly. Governing boards may require persons employed in positions requiring certification qualifications to serve a longer period time in each schoolday than the minimums defined in Sections 46112 to 46116, inclusive, and 46141, in order to be compensated as full-time employees, provided all such employees in similar grades or levels are similarly required to serve such longer periods of time, and provided that the duties required of such persons during such extended time shall be directly related to and restricted to their normal assignment. With respect to a unified school district, for the purposes of this section all day kindergarten and elementary schools of the unified school district shall be deemed to be maintained by one district and all day high schools of the unified school district shall be deemed to be maintained by a second and separate district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45025.
